src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h15_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: tjaldur
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: tjaldur
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: tjaldri
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: tjaldurs
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: tjøldur
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: tjøldur
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: tjøldrum
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: tjaldra
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: tjaldrið
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: tjaldrið
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: tjaldrinum
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: tjaldursins
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: tjøldrini
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: tjøldrini
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: tjøldrunum
    tjaldur+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: tjaldranna
